New Jersey, session 222, A5175.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    P.L.2026, c.4. (C. ) is repealed. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT This bill repeals the law establishing the Privacy Protection Act, P.L.2026, c.4. (C.        ), which concerns the collection and sharing of certain personal information by State and local government entities and health care facilities. Specifically, the law prohibits government entities and health care facilities from requesting or collecting information about a persons immigration status, citizenship status, place of birth, Social Security number, or individual taxpayer identification number unless that information is necessary to assess eligibility for, or administer, a requested public service, benefit, program, professional qualification, or licensure.  When collected for that purpose, this information is barred from disclosure except under certain circumstances, such as when required by a judicial order or federal law, or upon obtaining the pesons written consent.  In addition, with limited exceptions, the law prohibits government entities from selling, sharing, or transferring automated license plate recognition information concerning the operation of a motor vehicle. The law also requires government entities and health care facilities to develop policies and procedures to implement its provisions and authorizes private parties to bring a cause of action against violators for civil damages and injunctive relief. The sponsor believes that this law, by restricting the collection and sharing of information, impedes law enforcement agencies ability to identify and locate potential criminal offenders and creates an administrative burden on entities seeking to comply.